North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Article 9A. Borrowing by Cities for Competitive Purposes.

§ 159-175.10.
Additional requirements for review of city financing application; communications service.

The Commission shall apply additional requirements to an application for financing by a city or a joint agency under Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes for the construction, operation, expansion, or repair of a communications system or other infrastructure for the purpose of offering communications service, as that term is defined in

G.S. 160A-340(3)

, that is or will be competitive with communications service offered by a private communications service provider. This section does not apply to the repair, rebuilding, replacement, or improvement of an existing communications network, or equipment relating thereto, but does apply to the expansion of such existing network. The additional requirements are the following:

Prior to submitting an application to the Commission, a city or joint agency shall comply with the provisions of

G.S. 160A-340.3

requiring at least two public hearings on the proposed communications service project and notice of the hearings to private communications service providers who have requested notice.

At the same time the application is submitted to the Commission, the city or joint agency shall serve a copy of the application on each person that provides competitive communications service within the city’s jurisdictional boundaries or in areas adjacent to the city. No hearing on the application shall be heard by the Commission until at least 60 days after the application is submitted to the Commission.

Upon the request of a communications service provider, the Commission shall accept written and oral comments from competitive private communications service providers in connection with any hearing or other review of the application.

In considering the probable net revenues of the proposed communications service project, the Commission shall consider and make written findings on the reasonableness of the city or joint agency’s revenue projections in light of the current and projected competitive environment for the services to be provided, taking into consideration the potential impact of technological innovation and change on the proposed service offerings and the level of demonstrated community support for the project.

The city or joint agency making the application to the Commission shall bear the burden of persuasion with respect to subdivisions (1) through (4) of this section.

History.

2011-84, s. 3; 2012-194, s. 36.